Maryland, session 2025, HB1044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
TITLE 15.5. VOTING RIGHTS ACT – PRECLEARANCE AND VOTER INTIMIDATION
AND OBSTRUCTION.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS.
15.5–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1044*

HOUSE BILL 1044
INDICATED, UNLESS A DIFFERENT MEANING IS CLEARLY INTENDED FROM THE
CONTEXT.
(B) “ATTORNEY GENERAL” MEANS THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(C) “COURT” MEANS THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY.
(D) “COVERED JURISDICTION” MEANS A LOCAL GOVERNMENT:
(1) THAT, WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 25 YEARS, HAS
BECOME SUBJECT TO A COURT ORDER OR GOVERNMENT ENFORCEMENT ACTION
BASED ON A FINDING OF A VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE, THE FEDERAL VOTING RIGHTS
ACT, THE 15TH AMENDMENT TO THE U.S. CONSTITUTION, OR A VOTING–RELATED
VIOLATION OF THE 14TH AMENDMENT TO THE U.S. CONSTITUTION FOR
DISCRIMINATION AGAINST MEMBERS OF A PROTECTED CLASS;
(2) THAT, WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 25 YEARS, HAS
BECOME SUBJECT TO A COURT ORDER OR GOVERNMENT ENFORCEMENT ACTION
BASED ON A FINDING OF A VIOLATION OF A FEDERAL OR STATE CIVIL RIGHTS LAW
OR THE 14TH AMENDMENT TO THE U.S. CONSTITUTION CONCERNING A PATTERN,
PRACTICE, OR POLICY THAT RESULTED IN DISCRIMINATION AGAINST MEMBERS OF
A PROTECTED CLASS;
(3) THAT, WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 25 YEARS, WAS
FOUND TO HAVE ENACTED OR IMPLEMENTED A COVERED POLICY WITHOUT
OBTAINING PRECLEARANCE FOR THE COVERED POLICY UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(4) THAT CONTAINS AT LEAST 6,000 CITIZENS OF ANY PROTECTED
CLASS OF VOTING AGE, OR WHOSE MEMBERS CONSTITUTE AT LEAST 15% OF THE
CITIZEN VOTING–AGE POPULATION OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT AND WITHIN THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 10 YEARS:
(I) THE PERCENTAGE OF THE CITIZEN VOTING–AGE
POPULATION OF THE PROTECTED CLASS THAT IS REGISTERED TO VOTE IS AT LEAST
10 PERCENTAGE POINTS LOWER THAN THE PERCENTAGE OF ALL CITIZENS OF
VOTING AGE THAT ARE REGISTERED TO VOTE IN THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT;
(II) THE PERCENTAGE OF THE CITIZEN VOTING–AGE
POPULATION OF A PROTECTED CLASS THAT PARTICIPATED IN ANY GENERAL
ELECTION FOR LOCAL OFFICE, INCLUDING EXECUTIVE, LEGISLATIVE, JUDICIAL,
AND OTHER LOCAL OFFICES, IS AT LEAST 10 PERCENTAGE POINTS LOWER THAN THE
PERCENTAGE OF ALL CITIZENS OF VOTING AGE THAT PARTICIPATED IN THE

HOUSE BILL 1044 3
GENERAL ELECTION; OR
(III) HAS HAD A TRAFFIC STOP RATE OR THE COMBINED
MISDEMEANOR AND FELONY ARREST RATE OF MEMBERS OF ANY PROTECTED CLASS
THAT IS MORE THAN DOUBLE THE RATE OF THE WHOLE POPULATION OF THE
JURISDICTION.
(E) (1) “COVERED POLICY” MEANS A NEW OR MODIFIED STANDARD,
PRACTICE, PROCEDURE, LAW, ORDINANCE, REGULATION, OR POLICY THAT A
COVERED JURISDICTION IS REQUIRED TO SUBMIT FOR PRECLEARANCE.
(2) “COVERED POLICY” INCLUDES:
(I) IF THE COVERED JURISDICTION IS A MUNICIPALITY:
1. THE METHOD OF ELECTION FOR THE GOVERNING
BODY;
2. DISTRICTING OR REDISTRICTING;
3. THE NUMBER OF SEATS ON THE GOVERNING BODY;
4. ANNEXATION, INCORPORATION, DISSOLUTION,
CONSOLIDATION, OR DIVISION OF A MUNICIPALITY;
5. THE TIMING OF MUNICIPAL ELECTIONS;
6. VOTER REGISTRATION LISTS, INCLUDING THE
REMOVAL OF INDIVIDUALS FROM A VOTER REGISTRATION LIST AND CANCELLATION
OR DENIAL OF VOTER REGISTRATION;
7. VOTER CHALLENGERS, WATCHERS, OR OBSERVERS;
8. THE HOURS, LOCATIONS, OR NUMBER OF POLLING
PLACES, EARLY VOTING CENTERS, OR DROP BOX LOCATIONS;
9. THE REORGANIZATION OF PRECINCTS;
10. THE DISTRIBUTION OF VOTING EQUIPMENT AND
STAFF, INCLUDING ELECTION JUDGES, TO POLLING PLACES AND EARLY VOTING
CENTERS; AND
11. ANY ADDITIONAL SUBJECT MATTER THAT MAY BE

HOUSE BILL 1044
IDENTIFIED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL BY REGULATION;
(II) IF THE COVERED JURISDICTION IS A COUNTY OR COUNTY
BOARD OF EDUCATION:
1. THE METHOD OF ELECTION FOR THE GOVERNING
BODY OF THE COVERED JURISDICTION;
2. DISTRICTING OR REDISTRICTING;
3. THE NUMBER OF SEATS ON THE GOVERNING BODY OF
THE COVERED JURISDICTION; AND
4. ANY ADDITIONAL SUBJECT MATTER THAT MAY BE
IDENTIFIED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL BY REGULATION; AND
(III) A METHOD OF ELECTION OR A DISTRICTING PLAN IF A
COVERED JURISDICTION MAINTAINS THE METHOD OF ELECTION OR MAKES NO
REVISIONS TO THE DISTRICTING PLAN AFTER A DECENNIAL CENSUS.
(F) “GOVERNMENT ENFORCEMENT ACTION” MEANS A DENIAL OF
ADMINISTRATIVE OR JUDICIAL PRECLEARANCE BY THE FEDERAL OR STATE
GOVERNMENT, PENDING LITIGATION FILED BY A FEDERAL OR STATE ENTITY, A
FINAL JUDGMENT OR ADJUDICATION, A CONSENT DECREE, OR A SIMILAR FORMAL
ACTION.
(G) “LOCAL GOVERNMENT” MEANS:
(1) A MUNICIPALITY OR COUNTY, AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN §
1–101 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; OR
(2) A COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(H) “PRECLEARANCE” MEANS THE REQUIREMENT THAT A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SUBMIT THE PROPOSED ENACTMENT OR IMPLEMENTATION OF A
COVERED POLICY IN WRITING TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR THE COURT FOR
APPROVAL OR DENIAL.
SUBTITLE 2. PRECLEARANCE.
15.5–201.

HOUSE BILL 1044 5
(A) THE ENACTMENT OR IMPLEMENTATION OF A COVERED POLICY BY A
COVERED JURISDICTION IS SUBJECT TO PRECLEARANCE BY:
(1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, UNDER § 15.5–203 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
OR
(2) THE COURT, UNDER § 15.5–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT IS NOT A COVERED JURISDICTION MAY
SUBMIT A PROPOSED POLICY FOR PRECLEARANCE TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
UNDER § 15.5–203 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
15.5–202.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, AND AT LEAST ANNUALLY
THEREAFTER, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL DETERMINE WHICH LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS ARE COVERED JURISDICTIONS.
(B) A STATE AGENCY OR OTHER APPROPRIATE ENTITY SHALL TRANSMIT TO
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ANY DATA OR INFORMATION IN A USABLE FORMAT THAT
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL CONSIDERS NECESSARY TO MAKE THE DETERMINATION
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL:
(1) AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE, PUBLISH AND MAINTAIN A LIST OF
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS THAT ARE COVERED JURISDICTIONS ON THE WEBSITE OF
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL; AND
(2) PROVIDE NOTICE TO EACH LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT IS A
COVERED JURISDICTION.
15.5–203.
(A) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL:
(1) REVIEW A COVERED POLICY SUBMITTED FOR PRECLEARANCE,
INCLUDING ANY PUBLIC COMMENTS REGARDING THE COVERED POLICY; AND
(2) MAKE A DETERMINATION TO DENY OR GRANT PRECLEARANCE
FOR THE COVERED POLICY.
(B) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY DENY PRECLEARANCE ONLY IF IT

HOUSE BILL 1044
DETERMINES THAT THE COVERED POLICY IS MORE LIKELY THAN NOT TO:
(1) DIMINISH THE EQUAL OPPORTUNITY OR ABILITY OF PROTECTED
CLASS MEMBERS WHO ARE THE BASIS FOR THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT’S
PRECLEARANCE COVERAGE STATUS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
POLITICAL PROCESS OR NOMINATE OR ELECT CANDIDATES OF THEIR CHOICE; OR
(2) VIOLATE THIS TITLE.
(C) (1) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL GRANTS PRECLEARANCE, THE
APPLICABLE COVERED JURISDICTION MAY ENACT OR IMPLEMENT THE COVERED
POLICY.
(2) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DENIES PRECLEARANCE:
(I) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN
EXPLANATION OF THE DENIAL; AND
(II) THE APPLICABLE COVERED JURISDICTION MAY NOT ENACT
OR IMPLEMENT THE COVERED POLICY.
(3) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FAILS TO RESPOND WITHIN THE
REQUIRED TIME PERIOD UNDER § 15.5–204 OF THIS SUBTITLE, PRECLEARANCE FOR
THE COVERED POLICY SHALL BE DEEMED GRANTED AND THE APPLICABLE
JURISDICTION MAY ENACT OR IMPLEMENT THE COVERED POLICY.
(D) (1) A DENIAL OF PRECLEARANCE UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE
APPEALED ONLY BY THE COVERED JURISDICTION TO THE APPELLATE COURT OF
MARYLAND.
(2) A PARTY OTHER THAN THE COVERED JURISDICTION MAY NOT
FILE AN ACTION TO APPEAL A DENIAL OF PRECLEARANCE OR INTERVENE IN AN
APPEAL ACTION BROUGHT BY THE COVERED JURISDICTION.
(E) IN A PRECLEARANCE DETERMINATION SUBMITTED TO THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL, THE COVERED JURISDICTION SHALL BEAR THE BURDEN OF PROOF.
15.5–204.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND EXCEPT
AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE
RECEIPT OF A COVERED POLICY, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1044 7
(I) REVIEW THE COVERED POLICY, INCLUDING ANY PUBLIC
COMMENTS REGARDING THE COVERED POLICY; AND
(II) MAKE A DETERMINATION TO DENY OR GRANT
PRECLEARANCE FOR THE COVERED POLICY.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INVOKE AN EXTENSION OF UP TO
60 DAYS TO MAKE A DETERMINATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A COVERED POLICY
REGARDING:
(I) CHANGES TO THE METHOD OF ELECTION FOR A GOVERNING
BODY;
(II) DISTRICTING OR REDISTRICTING;
(III) THE NUMBER OF SEATS ON A GOVERNING BODY; OR
(IV) ANNEXATION, INCORPORATION, DISSOLUTION,
CONSOLIDATION, OR DIVISION OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND WITHIN
60 DAYS AFTER THE SUBMISSION OF THE COVERED POLICY, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL SHALL:
(I) REVIEW A COVERED POLICY SUBJECT TO THIS SUBSECTION
AND ANY PUBLIC COMMENTS REGARDING THE COVERED POLICY; AND
(II) MAKE A DETERMINATION TO DENY OR GRANT
PRECLEARANCE FOR THE COVERED POLICY.
(3) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INVOKE UP TO TWO EXTENSIONS
OF UP TO 90 DAYS TO MAKE A DETERMINATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
15.5–205.
(A) AS AN ALTERNATIVE TO PRECLEARANCE THROUGH THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL UNDER § 15.5–203 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A COVERED JURISDICTION MAY
SUBMIT A COVERED POLICY TO THE COURT FOR PRECLEARANCE.
(B) TO HAVE A COVERED POLICY BE CONSIDERED FOR PRECLEARANCE
UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COVERED JURISDICTION SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1044
(1) SUBMIT IN WRITING THE COVERED POLICY TO THE COURT; AND
(2) CONTEMPORANEOUSLY TRANSMIT TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
A COPY OF THE COVERED POLICY SUBMITTED TO THE COURT UNDER ITEM (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) THE COURT SHALL EXERCISE EXCLUSIVE JURISDICTION OVER A
COVERED POLICY THAT IS SUBMITTED AND TRANSMITTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) THE COURT SHALL GRANT OR DENY PRECLEARANCE WITHIN 60 DAYS
FOLLOWING THE RECEIPT OF THE SUBMISSION OF THE COVERED POLICY.
(E) THE COURT MAY DENY PRECLEARANCE ONLY IF IT DETERMINES THAT
THE COVERED POLICY IS MORE LIKELY THAN NOT TO:
(1) DIMINISH THE OPPORTUNITY OR ABILITY OF PROTECTED CLASS
MEMBERS WHO ARE THE BASIS FOR THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT’S PRECLEARANCE
COVERAGE STATUS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE POLITICAL
PROCESS OR NOMINATE OR ELECT CANDIDATES OF THEIR CHOICE; OR
(2) VIOLATE THIS TITLE.
(F) (1) IF THE COURT GRANTS PRECLEARANCE, THE APPLICABLE
COVERED JURISDICTION MAY ENACT OR IMPLEMENT THE COVERED POLICY.
(2) IF THE COURT DENIES PRECLEARANCE, THE COVERED POLICY
MAY NOT BE ENACTED OR IMPLEMENTED.
(3) IF THE COURT FAILS TO GRANT OR DENY PRECLEARANCE WITHIN
60 DAYS, THE COVERED JURISDICTION MAY NOT ENACT OR IMPLEMENT THE
COVERED POLICY.
(G) (1) A DENIAL OF PRECLEARANCE UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE
APPEALED ONLY BY THE COVERED JURISDICTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
ORDINARY RULES OF APPELLATE PROCEDURE.
(2) A PARTY OTHER THAN THE COVERED JURISDICTION MAY NOT
FILE AN ACTION TO APPEAL A DENIAL OF PRECLEARANCE OR INTERVENE IN AN
APPEAL ACTION BROUGHT BY THE COVERED JURISDICTION.
15.5–206.

HOUSE BILL 1044 9
IF A COVERED JURISDICTION ENACTS OR IMPLEMENTS A COVERED POLICY
WITHOUT FIRST OBTAINING PRECLEARANCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE,
THE FOLLOWING PERSONS MAY FILE AN ACTION IN THE COURT TO ENJOIN THE
ENACTMENT OR IMPLEMENTATION OF A COVERED POLICY AND SEEK SANCTIONS:
(1) AN AGGRIEVED PERSON;
(2) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE MEMBERSHIP INCLUDES OR IS LIKELY
TO INCLUDE AGGRIEVED PERSONS;
(3) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE MISSION WOULD BE FRUSTRATED BY A
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(4) AN ORGANIZATION THAT WOULD EXPEND RESOURCES IN ORDER
TO FULFILL ITS MISSION AS A RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(5) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
15.5–207.
(A) AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE BROUGHT IF:
(1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR THE COURT HAS APPROVED
PRECLEARANCE FOR A COVERED POLICY IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS IDENTIFIED A LIST OF COVERED
JURISDICTIONS THAT IS INCONSISTENT WITH THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(3) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS FAILED TO PROPERLY IMPLEMENT
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE FOLLOWING PERSONS MAY FILE AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) AN AGGRIEVED PERSON;
(2) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE MEMBERSHIP INCLUDES OR IS LIKELY
TO INCLUDE AGGRIEVED PERSONS;
(3) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE MISSION WOULD BE FRUSTRATED BY A
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(4) AN ORGANIZATION THAT WOULD EXPEND RESOURCES IN ORDER

HOUSE BILL 1044
TO FULFILL ITS MISSION AS A RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COURT:
(1) SHALL EVALUATE THE CLAIMS ON A DE NOVO BASIS AND MAY NOT
GIVE DEFERENCE TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR THE COURT;
(2) MAY PROVIDE INJUNCTIVE RELIEF OR ORDER ANY OTHER
ADEQUATE REMEDY; AND
(3) MAY STAY THE IMPLEMENTATION OF A COVERED POLICY UNTIL
THE COURT MAKES A DETERMINATION AS TO WHETHER PRECLEARANCE SHOULD
HAVE BEEN GRANTED.
(D) AN ACTION FILED UNDER THIS SECTION DOES NOT LIMIT ANY OTHER
CLAIMS THAT MAY BE BROUGHT REGARDING A COVERED POLICY, INCLUDING
CLAIMS UNDER THIS TITLE.
15.5–208.
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE, INCLUDING:
(1) THE CONTENT OF AND PROCEDURE FOR PRECLEARANCE
SUBMISSIONS; AND
(2) PROCEDURES FOR:
(I) PUBLIC COMMENT AND TRANSPARENCY FOR
PRECLEARANCE DETERMINATIONS; AND
(II) EXPEDITED OR EMERGENCY PRECLEARANCE
DETERMINATIONS.
SUBTITLE 3. PROHIBITION OF VOTER INTIMIDATION AND OBSTRUCTION.
15.5–301.
(A) A PERSON, WHETHER ACTING UNDER COLOR OF LAW OR OTHERWISE,
MAY NOT ENGAGE IN ACTS OF INTIMIDATION, DECEPTION, OR OBSTRUCTION THAT
INTERFERE WITH AN INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHT TO VOTE.
(B) THE FOLLOWING SHALL CONSTITUTE A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A)

HOUSE BILL 1044 11
OF THIS SECTION:
(1) THE USE OF FORCE OR THREATS TO USE FORCE, OR THE USE OF
ANY OTHER CONDUCT TO PRACTICE INTIMIDATION THAT CAUSES OR WILL
REASONABLY HAVE THE EFFECT OF CAUSING INTERFERENCE WITH AN
INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHT TO VOTE;
(2) THE KNOWING USE OF A DECEPTIVE OR FRAUDULENT DEVICE,
CONTRIVANCE, OR COMMUNICATION THAT CAUSES OR WILL REASONABLY HAVE THE
EFFECT OF CAUSING INTERFERENCE WITH ANY INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHT TO VOTE; OR
(3) THE OBSTRUCTION OF, IMPEDIMENT TO, OR OTHER
INTERFERENCE WITH ACCESS TO A POLLING PLACE, A BALLOT DROP BOX, OR AN
OFFICE OR A PLACE OF BUSINESS OF AN ELECTION OFFICIAL OR A VOTER IN A
MANNER THAT CAUSES OR WILL REASONABLY HAVE THE EFFECT OF CAUSING
INTERFERENCE WITH ANY INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHT TO VOTE OR ANY DELAY IN VOTING
OR THE VOTING PROCESS.
(C) THE FOLLOWING PERSONS MAY FILE AN ACTION ALLEGING A VIOLATION
OF THIS SECTION IN THE COURT:
(1) AN AGGRIEVED PERSON;
(2) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE MEMBERSHIP INCLUDES OR IS LIKELY
TO INCLUDE AGGRIEVED PERSONS;
(3) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE MISSION WOULD BE FRUSTRATED BY A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION;
(4) AN ORGANIZATION THAT WOULD EXPEND RESOURCES IN ORDER
TO FULFILL ITS MISSION AS A RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION; OR
(5) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(D) (1) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, IF THE COURT FINDS
A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL ORDER APPROPRIATE REMEDIES
THAT ARE TAILORED TO ADDRESS THE VIOLATION.
(II) THE REMEDIES ORDERED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH MAY INCLUDE PROVIDING FOR ADDITIONAL TIME TO VOTE
DURING AN ELECTION.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION OR WHO AIDS IN THE

HOUSE BILL 1044
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGES AWARDED BY THE
COURT, INCLUDING NOMINAL DAMAGES FOR ANY VIOLATION AND COMPENSATORY
OR PUNITIVE DAMAGES FOR ANY WILLFUL VIOLATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.